Maryland, session 2026, HB1094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–704.
(a) This section applies to each individual, group, or blanket health insurance
policy, contract, or certificate of an insurer or nonprofit health service plan that:
(1) (i) is delivered or issued for delivery in the State;
(ii) is issued to a group that is incorporated or has a main office in
the State; or
(iii) covers individuals who reside or work in the State; and
(2) is issued, renewed, amended, or reissued on or after October 1, 2003.
(b) If a policy, contract, or certificate subject to this section provides for
reimbursement for a service that is within the lawful scope of practice of a licensed clinical
professional counselor, a licensed clinical marriage and family therapist, a licensed clinical
alcohol and drug counselor, or a licensed clinical professional art therapist, the insured or
any other person covered by the policy or certificate is entitled to reimbursement for the
service.
– 1 –

Ch. 44 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A POLICY,
CONTRACT, OR CERTIFICATE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION PROVIDES FOR
REIMBURSEMENT OF A SERVICE THAT IS WITHIN THE LAWFUL SCOPE OF PRACTICE
OF A LICENSED GRADUATE PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR, THE INSURED OR ANY
OTHER PERSON COVERED BY THE POLICY, CONTRACT, OR CERTIFICATE IS ENTITLED
TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE SERVICE PROVIDED BY A GRADUATE–LEVEL
COUNSELING CLINICAL INTERN.
(2) THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
REIMBURSABLE IF THE SERVICES ARE:
(I) PROVIDED AT AN OUTPATIENT HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) PROVIDED BY A COUNSELING CLINICAL INTERN WHO IS:
1. ENROLLED IN A COUNSELING GRADUATE PROGRAM;
AND
2. PROVIDING THE SERVICES UNDER THE DIRECT
SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR AS
SUPERVISED BY A BOARD–APPROVED SUPERVISOR, AS DEFINED UNDER COMAR
10.58.12.02, WHO MEETS THE QUALIFICATION UNDER COMAR 10.58.12.08; AND
(III) BILLED BY THE SUPERVISING LICENSED CLINICAL
PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR BOARD–APPROVED SUPERVISOR OF THE COUNSELING
CLINICAL INTERN WHO PROVIDES SUPERVISION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (II)2
OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
15–707.
(a) This section applies to each individual, group, or blanket health insurance
policy of an insurer or nonprofit health service plan that:
(1) (i) is delivered or issued for delivery in the State;
(ii) is issued to a group that is incorporated or has a main office in
the State; or
(iii) covers individuals who reside or work in the State; and
(2) is issued, renewed, amended, or reissued on or after January 1, 1978.
(b) If a policy or certificate subject to this section provides for reimbursement for
a service that is within the lawful scope of practice of a licensed certified social worker, the
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 44
insured or any other person covered by the policy or certificate is entitled to reimbursement
for the service regardless of whether the service is performed by a physician or licensed
certified social worker–clinical.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A POLICY
OR CERTIFICATE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION PROVIDES FOR REIMBURSEMENT OF A
SERVICE THAT IS WITHIN THE LAWFUL SCOPE OF PRACTICE OF A LICENSED MASTER
SOCIAL WORKER, THE INSURED OR ANY OTHER PERSON COVERED BY THE POLICY,
CONTRACT, OR CERTIFICATE IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE SERVICE
PROVIDED BY A GRADUATE–LEVEL SOCIAL WORK CLINICAL INTERN.
(2) THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
REIMBURSABLE IF THE SERVICES ARE:
(I) PROVIDED AT AN OUTPATIENT HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) PROVIDED BY A SOCIAL WORK CLINICAL INTERN WHO IS:
1. ENROLLED IN A SOCIAL WORK GRADUATE PROGRAM;
AND
2. PROVIDING THE SERVICES UNDER THE DIRECT
SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL; AND
(III) BILLED BY THE SUPERVISING LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL
WORKER–CLINICAL.
15–714.
(a) This section applies to each individual or group health insurance policy,
contract, or certificate that:
(1) (i) is issued or delivered in the State;
(ii) is issued to a group that is incorporated or has a main office in
the State; or
(iii) covers individuals who reside or work in the State; and
(2) is issued, renewed, amended, or reissued on or after July 1, 1972.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of a policy, contract, or certificate subject
to this section, if the policy, contract, or certificate provides for reimbursement for a service
that is within the lawful scope of practice of a licensed psychologist, the insured or any
other person covered by the policy, contract, or certificate is entitled to reimbursement for
– 3 –

Ch. 44 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
the service regardless of whether the service is performed by a physician or licensed
psychologist.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A POLICY,
CONTRACT, OR CERTIFICATE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION PROVIDES FOR
REIMBURSEMENT OF A SERVICE THAT IS WITHIN THE LAWFUL SCOPE OF PRACTICE
OF A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST, THE INSURED OR ANY OTHER PERSON COVERED BY
THE POLICY, CONTRACT, OR CERTIFICATE IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR
THE SERVICE PROVIDED BY A GRADUATE–LEVEL PSYCHOLOGY CLINICAL INTERN.
(2) THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
REIMBURSABLE IF THE SERVICES ARE:
(I) PROVIDED AT AN OUTPATIENT HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(II) PROVIDED BY A PSYCHOLOGY CLINICAL INTERN WHO IS:
1. ENROLLED IN A PSYCHOLOGY GRADUATE PROGRAM;
AND
2. PROVIDING THE SERVICES UNDER THE DIRECT
SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST; AND
(III) BILLED BY THE SUPERVISING LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 4 –